Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-508
Distribution to new members of Legislature; section, termination.

The new members of each Legislature shall be furnished by the State Librarian or his or her designee, at the commencement of the first session for which they are elected, with one copy of each of the session laws and journals of the preceding session, with a second copy furnished to any such member upon such member's request.

This section terminates on January 1, 2027.

Laws 1907, c. 78, § 8, p. 291;

R.S.1913, § 3740;

C.S.1922, § 3133;

C.S.1929, § 49-508;

R.S.1943, § 49-508;

Laws 1975, LB 59, § 2;

Laws 1980, LB 598, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 572, § 4;

Laws 2010, LB770, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB1236, § 10.
July 18, 2026